Wyoming, session 2026, HB0002.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 16-13-101 and 16-13-102 are created
to read:
CHAPTER 13
BUILDING PERMIT TIMELINES
16-13-101. Applicability.
(a) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to:
(i) Any board of county commissioners that
regulates and restricts the location and use of buildings
and structures and the use, condition of use or occupancy
of lands for residence pursuant to W.S. 18-5-201 and any
board of county commissioners that has adopted a version of
the International Residential Code; and
(ii) Any governing body of a city or town that
regulates and restricts the location and use of buildings,
structures and land for trade, industry, residence or other
purposes, pursuant to W.S. 15-1-601 and that has adopted a
version of the International Residential Code.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
16-13-102. Permitting timeline for residential
building permits.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Application" means a residential building
permit application submitted by an applicant for the
construction of a dwelling that:
(A) Is not more than three (3) stories
above grade plane in height;
(B) Does not have accessory structures that
are more than three (3) stories above grade plane in
height;
(C) Has not more than three thousand
(3,000) square feet of finished floor area per dwelling
unit or townhouse unit; and
(D) Is regulated under the most recent
version of the International Residential Code adopted by
the local government entity.
(ii) "Delivered by electronic means" includes
delivery to an electronic mail address at which an
applicant has consented to receive notices, documents or
information or through permitting software used by the
local government entity;
(iii) "Dwelling" means a building that contains
one (1) or two (2) dwelling units used, intended or
designed to be built, used, rented, leased, let or hired
out to be occupied or that are occupied for living
purposes;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) "Dwelling unit" means a single unit
providing complete independent living facilities for one
(1) or more persons, including permanent provisions for
living, sleeping, eating, cooking and sanitation and that
has a separate means of egress;
(v) "Local government entity" means a governing
body of a city, town, county or other political subdivision
of the state, including a planning commission or a planning
and zoning commission;
(vi) "Means of egress" means a continuous and
unobstructed path of vertical and horizontal egress travel
from all portions of the dwelling unit to the required
egress door without requiring travel through a garage.
(b) A local government entity shall provide written
notice to the applicant not later than ten (10) business
days after receipt of an application, notifying the
applicant if the applicant's application is deemed complete
or incomplete. A local government entity shall deem an
applicant's application as incomplete if the application
fails to contain all information required by law or an
adopted ordinance, regulation or policy of the local
government entity. The written notice required under this
subsection shall explain what information is necessary for
the local government entity to deem the applicant's
application as complete. The written notice required under
this subsection may be delivered by electronic means.
(c) A local government entity shall approve or deny
an applicant's completed application not later than thirty
(30) calendar days after the date the completed application
is submitted. The thirty (30) calendar day deadline imposed
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
under this subsection shall not include any period that the
review of the completed application is suspended. A local
government entity may suspend review of a completed
application if one (1) or more of the following has
occurred:
(i) The applicant or local government entity
requests clarification or additional information regarding
the applicant's completed application. The deadline shall
be suspended under this paragraph until the clarification
or information is received by the requesting party;
(ii) An applicant's completed application
requires approval by a state or federal agency. The
deadline shall be suspended under this paragraph until the
completed application is approved by the state or federal
agency. If approval is required from more than one (1)
state or federal agency the deadline shall remain suspended
under this paragraph until all approvals have been
obtained.
(d) The thirty (30) day deadline imposed under
subsection (c) of this section may be extended if an
applicant and the local government entity agree in writing
to an extension of the deadline.
(e) If the local government entity denies the
applicant's completed application, the local government
entity shall provide written notice to the applicant not
later than seven (7) calendar days after the denial of the
applicant's completed application stating the reasons why
the local government entity denied the applicant's
completed application. The written notice required under
this subsection may be delivered by electronic means.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(f) Any requirements or conditions associated with an
applicant's application that were not imposed by a local
government entity during the initial review and approval of
an applicant's application that are imposed on an applicant
after the applicant's completed application has been
approved shall result in a ten percent (10%) reduction in
the fees charged by the local government entity for the
application, unless the requirements are a result of
unanticipated conditions of the subject property that
require the applicant to implement mitigation measures.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, if a local government entity fails to comply with
the deadline established under subsection (c) of this
section the applicant's completed application shall be
deemed approved as submitted on the day after the deadline
has lapsed. A building constructed pursuant to a permit
approved under this subsection shall remain subject to and
shall pass all safety and code compliance inspections
before a certificate of occupancy may be issued.
Section 2. This act shall apply to building permit
applications for the construction of a dwelling as defined
in this act filed on or after July 1, 2026.
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
6